Hawaii statutes.
§657-32 How computed. If the right
first accrued to any ancestor or predecessor of the person bringing the action
or making the entry, or to any persons from, by, or under whom the person
bringing the action or making the entry claims, the twenty years shall be
computed from the time when the right first accrued to the ancestor,
predecessor, or other persons. [L 1870, c 22, §2; am L 1898, c 19, §2; RL 1925,
§2658; RL 1935, §3929; RL 1945, §10440; RL 1955, §241-31; HRS §657-32; am L
1979, c 105, §61; am L 2016, c 55, §34]

Case Notes

Cited: 19 H. 602, 605 (1909).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next